Utah statutes.
57-22-7.   Limitation on counties and municipalities.

(1)  A county or municipality may not adopt an ordinance, resolution, or regulation that is inconsistent with this chapter.

(2) (a)  Subsection (1) may not be construed to limit the ability of a county or municipality to enforce an applicable administrative remedy with respect to a residential rental unit for a violation of a county or municipal ordinance, subject to Subsection (2)(b).

(b)  A county or municipality's enforcement of an administrative remedy may not have the effect of:

(i)  modifying the time requirements of a corrective period, as defined in Section 57-22-6;

(ii)  limiting or otherwise affecting a tenant's remedies under Section 57-22-6; or

(iii)  modifying an owner's obligation under this chapter to a tenant relating to the habitability of a residential rental unit.

